test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_alga_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  
  Noun - algâ:
    algâ+N+Sg+Nom: algâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Gen: aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Acc: aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Ill: aalgân
    algâ+N+Sg+Loc: aalgâst
    algâ+N+Sg+Com: algáin
    algâ+N+Sg+Abe: aˊlgâttáá
    algâ+N+Ess: algân
    algâ+N+Par: algâd
    algâ+N+Pl+Nom: aalgah
    algâ+N+Pl+Gen: [aalgâi, aˊlgâi]
    algâ+N+Pl+Acc: aalgâid
    algâ+N+Pl+Ill: algáid
    algâ+N+Pl+Loc: aalgâin
    algâ+N+Pl+Com: aˊlgâiguin
    algâ+N+Pl+Abe: aˊlgâittáá

  Noun - ristâ:
    ristâ+N+Sg+Nom: ristâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Gen: riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Acc: riistâ
    ristâ+N+Sg+Ill: riistân
    ristâ+N+Sg+Loc: riistâst
    ristâ+N+Sg+Com: ristáin
    ristâ+N+Sg+Abe: riˊstâttáá
    ristâ+N+Ess: ristân
    ristâ+N+Par: ristâd
    ristâ+N+Pl+Nom: riistah
    ristâ+N+Pl+Gen: [riistâi, riˊstâi]
    ristâ+N+Pl+Acc: riistâid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Ill: ristáid
    ristâ+N+Pl+Loc: riistâin
    ristâ+N+Pl+Com: riˊstâiguin
    ristâ+N+Pl+Abe: riˊstâittáá

  Noun - kolbâ:
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Nom: kolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Gen: koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Acc: koolbâ
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Ill: koolbân
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Loc: koolbâst
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Com: kolbáin
    kolbâ+N+Sg+Abe: koˊlbâttáá
    kolbâ+N+Ess: kolbân
    kolbâ+N+Par: kolbâd
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Nom: koolbah
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koolbâi, koˊlbâi]
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Acc: koolbâid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Ill: kolbáid
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Loc: koolbâin
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Com: koˊlbâiguin
    kolbâ+N+Pl+Abe: koˊlbâittáá

  Noun - muršâ:
    muršâ+N+Sg+Nom: muršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Gen: muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Acc: muuršâ
    muršâ+N+Sg+Ill: muuršân
    muršâ+N+Sg+Loc: muuršâst
    muršâ+N+Sg+Com: muršáin
    muršâ+N+Sg+Abe: muˊršâttáá
    muršâ+N+Ess: muršân
    muršâ+N+Par: muršâd
    muršâ+N+Pl+Nom: muuršah
    muršâ+N+Pl+Gen: [muuršâi, muˊršâi]
    muršâ+N+Pl+Acc: muuršâid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Ill: muršáid
    muršâ+N+Pl+Loc: muuršâin
    muršâ+N+Pl+Com: muˊršâiguin
    muršâ+N+Pl+Abe: muˊršâittáá

  Noun - rytmâ:
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Nom: rytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Gen: ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Acc: ryytmâ
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Ill: ryytmân
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Loc: ryytmâst
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Com: rytmáin
    rytmâ+N+Sg+Abe: ryˊtmâttáá
    rytmâ+N+Ess: rytmân
    rytmâ+N+Par: rytmâd
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Nom: ryytmah
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Gen: [ryytmâi, ryˊtmâi]
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Acc: ryytmâid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Ill: rytmáid
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Loc: ryytmâin
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Com: ryˊtmâiguin
    rytmâ+N+Pl+Abe: ryˊtmâittáá

  Noun - robdâ:
    robdâ+N+Sg+Nom: robdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Gen: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Acc: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Ill: roobdân
    robdâ+N+Sg+Loc: roobdâst
    robdâ+N+Sg+Com: robdáin
    robdâ+N+Sg+Abe: roˊbdâttáá
    robdâ+N+Ess: robdân
    robdâ+N+Par: robdâd
    robdâ+N+Pl+Nom: roobdah
    robdâ+N+Pl+Gen: [roobdâi, roˊbdâi]
    robdâ+N+Pl+Acc: roobdâid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Ill: robdáid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Loc: roobdâin
    robdâ+N+Pl+Com: roˊbdâiguin
    robdâ+N+Pl+Abe: roˊbdâittáá
